Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 5
SOUTHEAST INTERSTATE LOW-LEVEL RADIOACTIVE WASTE MANAGEMENT COMPACT

Cross references.

- Other interstate compacts pertaining to conservation and natural resources, T. 12, C. 10.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Radioactive waste material disposal, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection Division, Subject 391-3-9.

Radioactive materials, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection Division, Subject 391-3-17.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982).

12-8-120. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact."

(Code 1981, §

12-8-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2389, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "shall be known and" was inserted.

12-8-121. Compact enacted and entered into by State of Georgia.

The Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact is enacted into law and entered into by the State of Georgia.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2389, § 1.)

12-8-122. Text of compact.

The Compact is substantially as follows:

'

'ARTICLE I. POLICY AND PURPOSE

There is hereby created the Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact. The party states recognize and declare that each state is responsible for providing for availability of capacity either within or outside the state for disposal of low-level radioactive waste generated within its borders, except for waste generated as a result of defense activities of the federal government or federal research and development activities. They also recognize that the management of low-level radioactive waste is handled most efficiently on a regional basis. The party states further recognize that the Congress of the United States, by enacting the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Policy Act (P.L. 96-573), has provided for and encouraged the development of low-level radioactive waste compacts as a tool for disposal of such waste. The party states recognize that the safe and efficient management of low-level radioactive waste generated within the region requires that sufficient capacity to dispose of such waste be properly provided.

It is the policy of the party states to: enter into a regional low-level radioactive waste management compact for the purpose of providing the instrument and framework for a cooperative effort; provide sufficient facilities for the proper management of low-level radioactive waste generated in the region, promote the health and safety of the region; limit the number of facilities required to effectively and efficiently manage low-level radioactive waste generated in the region; encourage the reduction of the amounts of low-level waste generated in the region; distribute the costs, benefits, and obligations of successful low-level radioactive waste management equitably among the party states; and ensure the ecological and economical management of low-level radioactive wastes.

Implicit in the Congressional consent to this Compact is the expectation by the Congress and the party states that the appropriate federal agencies will actively assist the Compact Commission and the individual party states to this Compact by:

expeditious enforcement of federal rules, regulations, and laws; and

imposing sanctions against those found to be in violation of federal rules, regulations, and laws; and

timely inspection of their licensees to determine their capability to adhere to such rules, regulations, and laws; and

timely provision of technical assistance to this Compact in carrying out their obligations under the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Policy Act as amended.

12-8-123. Appointment of members of Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Commission and their alternates.

The members of the commission from the State of Georgia and their alternates shall be appointed by the Governor to serve as members of the commission and alternates at the pleasure of the Governor.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-123

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2389, § 1.)